Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202614-137
Ordinances; how enacted.

The style of ordinances of a city of the metropolitan class shall be as follows: Be it ordained by the city council of the city of ........... . All ordinances of the city shall be passed pursuant to such rules and regulations as the city council may prescribe. Upon the passage of all ordinances the yeas and nays shall be recorded in the minutes of the city council, and a majority of the votes of all the members of the city council shall be necessary for passage. No ordinance shall be passed within a week after its introduction, except the general appropriation ordinances for salaries and wages other than salaries of the mayor and city council members. Ordinances of a general or permanent nature shall be read by title on three different days unless three-fourths of the city council vote to suspend this requirement, except that such requirement shall not be suspended (1) for any ordinance for the annexation of territory or the redrawing of boundaries for city council election districts or wards or (2) as otherwise provided by law.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. I, § 36, p. 418;

C.S.1922, § 3524;

C.S.1929, § 14-137;

R.S.1943, § 14-137;

Laws 2018, LB865, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB131, § 9;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 34;

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 35.

An ordinance pending and previously twice read may be passed at special meeting, call for which specifies consideration of ordinance. National Life Ins. Co. v. City of Omaha, 73 Neb. 41, 102 N.W. 73 (1905).